Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Chapter 25 Plane Coordinates System

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1993, ch. 70, § 1, enacted this chapter as chapter 24 (§§

34-24-101

through

34-24-108

). It has been redesignated as chapter 25 (§§

34-25-101

through

34-25-108

) in light of the enactment of chapter 24 by Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

§ 34-25-101.
System of plane coordinates adopted; zones.

The system of plane coordinates which has been established by the office of National Geodetic Survey, or its successors, for defining and stating the positions or locations of points on the surface of the earth within the state of Wyoming is adopted and hereafter shall be known and designated as the “Wyoming Coordinate System NAD 1983.”

For the purpose of the use of this system, the state is divided into an East Zone, an East Central Zone, a West Central Zone and a West Zone:

As established for use in the East Zone, the Wyoming Coordinate System shall be named, and in any land description in which it is used it shall be designated, the “Wyoming Coordinate System NAD 1983, East Zone.” The following counties will use Wyoming Coordinate System NAD 1983, East Zone: Laramie, Albany, Platte, Niobrara, Converse, Weston, Crook, Campbell, and Goshen;

As established for use in the East Central Zone, the Wyoming Coordinate System shall be named, and in any land description in which it is used it shall be designated, the “Wyoming Coordinate System NAD 1983, East Central Zone.” The following counties will use Wyoming Coordinate System NAD 1983, East Central Zone: Carbon, Natrona, Johnson, Sheridan, Washakie, and Big Horn;

As established for use in the West Central Zone, the Wyoming Coordinate System shall be named, and in any land description in which it is used it shall be designated, the “Wyoming Coordinate System NAD 1983, West Central Zone.” The following counties will use Wyoming Coordinate System NAD 1983, West Central Zone: Sweetwater, Fremont, Hot Springs, and Park;

As established for use in the West Zone, the Wyoming Coordinate System shall be named, and in any land description in which it is used it shall be designated, the “Wyoming Coordinate System NAD 1983, West Zone.” The following counties will use Wyoming Coordinate System NAD 1983, West Zone: Uinta, Lincoln, Sublette, and Teton; also Yellowstone National Park.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 70, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

34-24-101

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Conveyance with reference to tree or similar monument as giving title to center thereof, 61 ALR5th 739.

§ 34-25-102.
Designation of coordinates.

The plane coordinates of a point on the earth’s surface, to be used in expressing the position or location of such point in the appropriate zone of this system, shall consist of two (2) linear distances, expressed in meters to the nearest millimeter. One (1) of these distances, to be known as the “x-coordinate” or “east-coordinate,” shall give the position in an east-and-west direction; the other, to be known as the “y-coordinate” or “north-coordinate,” shall give the position in a north-and-south direction. These coordinates shall depend upon and conform to the coordinates, on the Wyoming Coordinate System NAD 1983 of the National Geodetic Survey, or its successors, within the state of Wyoming, as those coordinates have been determined by the survey.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 70, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

34-24-102

.

§ 34-25-103.
Land extending into a second zone.

When any tract of land to be defined by a single description extends from one into a second of the coordinate zones specified in W.S.

34-25-101

, the positions of all the points on its boundaries may be referred to either of the two (2) zones, and the zone which is used shall be specifically named in the description.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 70, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

34-24-103

; 2008, ch. 116, § 1.

The 2008 amendment

substituted “W.S.

34-25-101

” for “W.S.

34-24-101

.”

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

§ 34-25-104.
Definition of zones; horizontal control stations.

For purposes of more precisely defining the Wyoming Coordinate System NAD 1983 the following definition of the zones is adopted:

The Wyoming Coordinate System NAD 1983, East Zone, is a transverse Mercator projection of the North American Datum of 1983, having a central meridian at 105°10´ West of Greenwich on which meridian the scale is set at one part in 16,000 exactly. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the parallel at 40°30´ North Latitude and the meridian at 105°10´ West of Greenwich. This origin is given the coordinates: x= 200,000 meters and y= 0 meters;

The Wyoming Coordinate System NAD 1983, East Central Zone, is a transverse Mercator projection of the North American Datum of 1983, having a central meridian at 107°20´ West of Greenwich on which meridian the scale is set at one part in 16,000 exactly. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the parallel at 40°30´ North Latitude and the meridian at 107°20´ West of Greenwich. This origin is given the coordinates: x= 400,000 meters and y= 100,000 meters;

The Wyoming Coordinate System NAD 1983, West Central Zone, is a transverse Mercator projection of the North American Datum of 1983, having a central meridian at 108°45´ West of Greenwich on which meridian the scale is set at one part in 16,000 exactly. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the parallel at 40°30´ North Latitude and the meridian at 108°45´ West of Greenwich. This origin is given the coordinates: x= 600,000 and y= 0 meters;

The Wyoming Coordinate System NAD 1983, West Zone, is a transverse Mercator projection of the North American Datum of 1983, having a central meridian at 110°05´ West of Greenwich on which meridian the scale is set at one part in 16,000 exactly. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the parallel at 40°30´ North Latitude and the meridian at 110°05´ West of Greenwich. This origin is given the coordinates: x= 800,000 meters and y= 100,000 meters.

The position of any survey control point in the Wyoming Coordinate System NAD 1983 shall be as marked on the ground by horizontal control stations established in conformity with standards adopted by the Federal Geodetic Control Committee, or its successors, using first-order, second-order or higher-order accuracy survey work, whose geodetic positions have been rigorously adjusted on the North American Datum of 1983 and whose coordinates have been computed on the system herein defined. Any such station may be used for establishing a connection with the Wyoming Coordinate System NAD 1983.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 70, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

34-24-104

.

§ 34-25-105.
Recording coordinates; use of satellite survey techniques.

No coordinates based on the Wyoming Coordinate System NAD 1983, purporting to define the position of a point on a land boundary, shall be presented to be recorded in any public land records or deed records in the office of a county clerk unless a record and report of survey of the actual survey to establish the plane coordinates of the point has been filed with the county surveyor, the county engineer or the county clerk and in conformity with the standards prescribed in W.S.

34-25-104

. When acceptable satellite survey techniques are employed, a minimum of two (2) independent observing sessions shall be executed and shall agree to not less than one (1) part in one hundred thousand (100,000) of the distance between the points. The procedures and results shall conform with the standards in W.S.

34-25-104

.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 70, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

34-24-105

.

§ 34-25-106.
Reference to system on maps.

The use of the term “Wyoming Coordinate System NAD 1983” on any map, report of survey or other document, shall be limited to plane coordinates based on the Wyoming Coordinate System NAD 1983 as defined in this chapter.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 70, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

34-24-106

.

§ 34-25-107.
Description in other surveys; conflicts.

Wherever coordinates based on the Wyoming Coordinate System NAD 1983 are used to describe any tract of land which in the same document is also described by reference to any subdivision, line or corner of the United States public land surveys, the description by plane coordinates shall be construed as supplemental to the basic description of such subdivision, line or corner contained in the official plats and field notes filed of record, and in the event of any conflict the description by reference to the subdivision, line or corner of the United States public land surveys shall prevail over the description by plane coordinates. Every recorded map, survey or conveyance, or other instrument affecting title to real property which delineates, describes or refers to such property or any part thereof by reference to coordinates based upon the Wyoming Coordinate System NAD 1983 shall also describe the property by reference and tie to a controlling corner monument of the United States public land surveys, if applicable.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 70, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

34-24-107

.

§ 34-25-108.
Application.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall require any purchaser or mortgagee to rely on a description, any part of which depends exclusively upon Wyoming Coordinate System NAD 1983.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 70, § 1; W.S. 1977,

34-24-108

.